Rhode Island, session 2026, HB7503.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. The general assembly hereby makes the following findings of fact:
(1) Primary care healthcare in the State of Rhode Island is in crisis.
(2) There currently exists a national and regional shortage of primary care healthcare
providers.
(3) Many primary care healthcare providers are retiring early and many more are
approaching retirement age.
(4) Primary care healthcare is provided by physicians, nurse practitioners and physician
assistants and the overall numbers of medical professionals entering the field of primary care
healthcare is declining.
(5) It is increasingly difficult for primary care practices to hire nurses, medical assistants,
behavioral health clinicians and other key staff, which is leading to even higher burnout among
primary care providers.
(6) Fewer students are going into primary care as a profession due to lower salaries, high
student loans and increasing administrative burden leading to provider burnout.
(7) Our aging Rhode Island population requires more medical care.
(8) As a state, we must recruit, train, retain and sustain the number of primary care
providers sufficient to meet the population health needs of all Rhode Islanders.
(9) Investments in primary care are essential for access to health services, improving the

health of the population and reducing overall healthcare costs.
SECTION 2. Title 23 of the General Laws entitled "HEALTH AND SAFETY" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following chapter:
CHAPTER 1.12
THE MEDICAL PRIMARY CARE SCHOLARSHIP PROGRAM
23-1.12-1. Short title.
This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the "The Medical Primary Care
Scholarship Program".
23-1.12-2. Establishment of scholarship program.
There is hereby established the medical primary care scholarship program to be
administered by the director of the department of health in consultation with the commissioner of
post-secondary education. This program shall be aligned with the RIDOH office of primary care
and rural health and leverage existing infrastructure with the loan repayment program.
23-1.12-3. Definitions.
When used in this chapter, the following words are construed as follows:
(1) "Commissioner" means the commissioner of postsecondary education appointed
pursuant to the provisions of § 16-59-6.
(2) "Director" means the director of the department of health holding office pursuant to the
provisions of §§ 42-6-9 and 42-6-10.
(3) "Primary care" means healthcare services that cover a range of prevention, wellness
and treatment for common illnesses and injuries. Primary care includes patients making an initial
approach to a healthcare professional for treatment as well as long-term relationships established
between a patient and a healthcare professional and may include family medicine or medical care,
general internal medicine or medical care, and general medical practice.
(4) "Scholarship program" means the medical primary care scholarship program
established pursuant to § 23-1.12-2.
23-1.12-4. Powers.
The director, in consultation with the commissioner, is authorized and empowered:
(1) To adopt rules and regulations to implement the provisions of this chapter if necessary;
(2) To adopt selection criteria, consistent with the provisions of this chapter to include, but
not be limited to:
(i) Identification of exemplary scholars seeking to serve as a medical professional;
(ii) Identification of scholars demonstrating a strong desire to establish and work in the
primary care healthcare area;
LC004402 - Page 2 of 7

(iii) Identification of scholars who have a demonstrated connection to or desire to establish
a long-term professional commitment to serving as a primary care provider in the State of Rhode
Island; and
(iv) Identification of scholars to match the diversity of Rhode Island's population;
(3) To establish, if the director deems it advisable, a nonprofit organization registered with
the secretary of state, as the entity to administer and operate all administrative program services to
be operated under the direct supervision of the director;
(4) To leverage loan repayment infrastructure to establish an application procedure for
scholarship consideration and awarding of scholarships;
(5) To supervise the disbursement of the scholarship fund; and
(6) To perform all other acts necessary to carry out the intent, purpose and provisions of
this chapter.
23-1.12-5. Eligibility for medical school scholarship.
To be eligible for medical school scholarship consideration, an applicant shall:
(1) Complete the application procedure established by the director;
(2) Be graduating or having graduated from an accredited college or university;
(3) Have an established record of excellent academic standing;
(4) Have been accepted for admission in a medical school in the United States; and
(5) Comply with all requirements and conditions of the scholarship program and the
provisions of this chapter.
23-1.12-6. Eligibility for nurse practitioner or physician assistant scholarship.
To be eligible for a scholarship for attendance at a nurse practitioner or physician assistant
educational training institution or program, an applicant shall:
(1) Complete the application procedure established by the director;
(2) Have completed all educational requirements for admission to the nurse practitioner or
physician assistant educational training program;
(3) Have an established record of excellent academic standing;
(4) Have been accepted for admission in a degree or educational training program located
in the United States for nurse practitioners or physician assistants; and
(5) Comply with all requirements and conditions of the program established pursuant to
the provisions of this chapter.
23-1.12-7. Award of scholarship - Conditions.
(a) At any time that sufficient funds become available, the director may award up to five
(5) new medical school scholarships per academic year, five (5) new nurse practitioner scholarships
LC004402 - Page 3 of 7

per academic year, and five (5) new physician assistant scholarships per academic year.
(b) Any medical school scholarship awarded shall continue for a period of four (4) years
and any nurse practitioner or physician assistant scholarship shall continue for a period of two (2)
years; provided the recipient maintains good academic standing and continues to comply with all
rules, regulations and conditions of the scholarship program.
(c) The maximum award for a recipient of the medical school scholarship shall be seventy
thousand dollars ($70,000) per academic year.
(d) The maximum award for a recipient of the nurse practitioner or the physician assistant
scholarship shall be forty seven thousand dollars ($47,000) per academic year.
(e) All recipients for scholarship funds shall execute a contract agreeing to work in Rhode
Island providing primary care healthcare services upon completion of their respective education,
licensing and any applicable internship. In addition to the contract, each recipient shall sign a
promissory note for all funds received from the scholarship program. The contract and promissory
note shall be prepared by the commissioner in consultation with the attorney general.
(f) Every contract shall be negotiated and approved pursuant to the provisions of § 42-11-
11.
23-1.12-8. Contract and promissory note.
(a) Every recipient of scholarship funds pursuant to the provisions of this chapter shall
execute a contract negotiated and approved pursuant to § 42-11-11, and a promissory note prior to
the receipt of any funds.
(b) The contract shall require the recipient to:
(1) Attend full-time the specified academic institution or educational program which shall
qualify the recipient to provide primary care healthcare services;
(2) Maintain academic good standing;
(3) Graduate on time for a full-time student attending the academic institution or program;
and
(4) Agree upon graduation and licensing to provide two (2) years of full-time work or part-
time work, defined as twenty-four (24) hours per week. The part-time work commitment would be
prorated to the number of years required to fulfill the work obligation, providing primary care health
services in Rhode Island for each year a scholarship award was received.
(c) The contract shall provide that for every two (2) year period that the scholarship
recipient following graduation, works full-time in Rhode Island providing primary care healthcare
services, then the amount of the scholarship award received by the recipient for one academic year
shall be forgiven and cancelled. If the recipient has received the maximum scholarship award over
LC004402 - Page 4 of 7

four (4) academic years then upon eight (8) years of working full-time, or the prorated equivalent
for part time work, in Rhode Island providing primary care healthcare services then all scholarship
funds received shall be forgiven and the promissory note cancelled.
23-1.12-9. Repayment of funds.
(a) Any recipient of scholarship funds who fails to comply with the rules or regulations
promulgated pursuant to § 23-1.12-3, the provisions of this chapter or the terms of the contract for
receipt of funds shall immediately pay and return all funds received to the director.
(b) All scholarship funds shall be repaid to the director if:
(1) The student fails to complete the educational program;
(2) The student fails to comply with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section; or
(3) The student fails to work full-time or part-time providing primary care healthcare
services in Rhode Island for any of the required contract period of time following graduation and
licensing.
(c) Partial scholarship funds shall be repaid to the director should the recipient partially
fulfill the contract obligation but fails to work two (2) years providing full-time or part-time
prorated equivalent primary care healthcare service in Rhode Island for every year scholarship
funds were received. The reimbursement shall be pro-rated for qualified time working applied to
the gross amount received by the recipient.
(d) Interest shall accrue on all funds owed by the recipient pursuant to the provisions of §
9-21-10.
(e) The attorney general is authorized and empowered to bring proceedings to recover all
amounts due under the provisions of this section.
(f) All sums recovered pursuant to the provisions of this section shall be redeposited in the
restricted receipt account to implement the scholarship program.
23-1.12-10. Appropriations.
(a) For the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, there is hereby appropriated, a transfer of
the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) from the Wavemaker Fellowships Program
established in chapter 64.26 of title 42, and out of money in the treasury not otherwise appropriated,
the sum of five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) for a total of one million dollars ($1,000,000)
per year deposited into a restricted receipt account to implement the scholarship program
established in § 23-1.12-2; and the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw to the
controller's orders upon the general treasurer for payment of said sum, or so much thereof as may
be from time to time required, upon the receipt by the general treasurer of properly authenticated
vouchers submitted by the commissioner on an annual basis over a minimum period of four (4)
LC004402 - Page 5 of 7

years. A portion of the funding may be used for one full-time employee to administer the
scholarship program.
(b) For fiscal year 2027-2028, and each fiscal year thereafter, the general assembly shall
annually appropriate a sum as it may deem necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter, and
the state controller is hereby authorized and directed to draw the controller's orders upon the general
treasurer for the payment of the sum or sums or so much thereof as may be required from time to
time to be deposited in a restricted receipt account upon receipt by the general treasurer of properly
authenticated vouchers submitted by the commissioner.
23-1.12-11. Audits.
(a) The commissioner shall submit annually all financial records and receipts of
disbursements to the auditor general and the director of administration.
(b) The auditor general and the director of administration are authorized to review and audit
all records, receipts, disbursements and transactions concerning the scholarship program and the
funds associated with the scholarship program.
23-1.12-12. Reports.
Commencing December 31, 2027, and every December 31 thereafter, the commissioner
shall report annually to the general assembly and the governor on the status and progress of the
scholarship program established and administered pursuant to the provisions of this chapter.
23-1.12-13. Severability.
If any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation promulgated pursuant to the
provisions of this chapter, or its application to any person or circumstance, is held invalid by a court
of competent jurisdiction, the remainder of the chapter, rule or regulation and the application of the
provision to other persons or circumstances shall not be affected by its invalidity. The invalidity of
any section or sections or portion of any section or sections of this chapter shall not affect the
validity of the remainder of this chapter.
SECTION 3. This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
========
LC004402
========
LC004402 - Page 6 of 7